Missouri, session 2026, HB2234.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 140.230, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 140.230, to read as follows:
140.230. 1. When real estate has been sold for taxes or other debt by the sheriff or
collector of any county within the state of Missouri, and the same sells for a greater amount
than the debt or taxes and all costs in the case it shall be the duty of the sheriff or collector of
the county, when such sale has been or may hereafter be made, to make a written statement
describing each parcel or tract of land sold by [him] such sheriff or collector for a greater
amount than the debt or taxes and all costs in the case together with the amount of surplus
money in each case. The statement shall be subscribed and sworn to by the sheriff or
collector making it before some officer competent to administer oaths within this state, and
then presented to the county commission of the county where the sale has been or may be
made; and on the approval of the statement by the commission, the sheriff or collector making
the same shall pay the surplus money into the county treasury, take the receipt in duplicate of
the treasurer for the surplus of money and retain one of the duplicate receipts and file the
other with the county commission, and thereupon the commission shall charge the treasurer
with the amount.
2. (1) The treasurer shall place such moneys in the county treasury to be held for the
use and benefit of the person entitled to such moneys or to the credit of the school fund of the
county, to be held in trust for the lesser of a term of three years or ninety days following the
expiration of the redemption period for the lienholders of record or for the publicly recorded
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2234 2
owner or owners of the property sold at the time of the delinquent land tax auction or their
legal representatives.
(2) The surplus shall be first distributed to the former lienholders of record, by
priority of the former liens, if any, then to the former owner or owners of the property. Lien
priority shall be set as of the date of the tax sale. No surplus funds shall be distributed to any
party claiming entitlement to such funds, other than as part of the redemption process, until
ninety days have passed after the period of redemption has expired.
(3) (a) At the end of three years, if any funds have not been distributed or called for
as part of a redemption or collector's deed issuance, then such funds shall [become a
permanent school fund of the county] be reported and transferred to the unclaimed
property division of the office of state treasurer.
(b) The county shall notify each former owner of the property of such transfer of
moneys and such property owner's right to reclaim such moneys within thirty days after
the county makes such transfer. The county shall include a notice containing
substantially the same information with the certificate of sale of the property.
3. County commissions shall compel owners, lienholders of record, or agents to make
satisfactory proof of their claims before receiving their money; provided, that no county shall
pay interest to the claimant of any such fund. Upon receipt of satisfactory proof of
entitlement, the county commission shall issue payment of such surplus funds to the
entitled party within sixty days. Any such claim shall be filed with the county commission
within ninety days after the expiration of the redemption period, be made in writing, and
include reference to the lien of record upon which the claim is made. The reference shall
include the county recorder's recording reference information such as book and page number,
document number, or other reference information if the lien is not referenced either by book
or page number or document number. Should more than one party make claim to any surplus
funds and those parties are unable to reach an agreement satisfactory to the county
commission, the county commission shall petition the circuit court within the county where
the county commission sits for interpleader. The county commission shall only be required to
name as defendants those parties who have made claim to the funds. Upon judgment
sustaining the petition for interpleader and the subsequent tender of the surplus funds to the
court registry, the county commission so tendering such funds shall be entitled to seek
discharge from the case.
✔